Tennessee, session 114, SB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-116, is amended by designating
subsection (b) as subdivision (b)(1) and adding the following as a new subdivision (b)(2):
(2)
(A) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if the petitioners are
seeking to adopt more than one (1) child at the same time and the children are
siblings who share at least one (1) biological parent, then the petitioners may
include all of the children in one (1) petition to adopt unless the court issues a
written order finding that it is in the best interest of the children that separate
petitions be filed.
(B) The clerk of court shall charge only one (1) filing fee for a petition
filed pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(A).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-113(d), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5)
(A) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if the petitioners are
seeking to adopt more than one (1) child at the same time and the children are
siblings who share at least one (1) biological parent, then the petitioners may
include all of the children in one (1) petition to terminate parental rights, if filed
SB1005
003227
- 1 -

separately from the adoption petition, unless the court issues a written order
finding that it is in the best interest of the children that separate petitions be filed.
(B) The clerk of court shall charge only one (1) filing fee for a petition
filed pursuant to subdivision (d)(5)(A).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003227